Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-922
Amount of entitlement; department; rules and regulations.

For purposes of determining medical assistance eligibility and the right to and obligation of medical support pursuant to sections 68-716, 68-915, and 68-916, a spouse may retain (1) assets equivalent to the community spouse resource allowance and (2) an amount of income equivalent to the community spouse monthly income allowance.

The department shall administer this section in accordance with section 1924 of the Social Security Act, as amended, Public Law 100-360, 42 U.S.C. 1396r-5, and shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to implement and enforce sections 68-921 to 68-925.

Laws 1988, LB 419, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 362, § 12;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 68-1039;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 22;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 251.